src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR:%- ab-cases ; 

LEXICON ab-cases
+Sg: # ; ! fix
+Sg: # ; ! fix 

+Der/са+A:%>са A_ ;

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
+ABBR:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+N+ABBR:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;
лб  ab-nodot-noun ;
АББА ab-nodot-noun ;
АВ  ab-nodot-noun ;
АВИА  ab-nodot-noun ;
АО  ab-nodot-noun ;
АПК  ab-nodot-noun ;
БАМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
БРИКС  ab-nodot-noun ;
БРОНЗА  ab-nodot-noun ;
БУМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАН  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВДВ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВИЧ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВТБ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВУЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГИБДД  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГПТУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГРКЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГУП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДНС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДРУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЦП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЮЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕГАИС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕГЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЖКХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЗАГС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЗАО  ab-nodot-noun ;
ИЖС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ИКЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ИНН  ab-nodot-noun ;
КАМАЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КАШ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КБК  ab-nodot-noun ;
КВН  ab-nodot-noun ;
КМНС  ab-nodot-noun ;
КМЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПП  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПРФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПСС  ab-nodot-noun ;
КСК  ab-nodot-noun ;
КТЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КФХ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛДПР ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛОС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛПУМГ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛПУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛЭП  ab-nodot-noun ;
МАУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
МАФУН  ab-nodot-noun ;
МБОУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
МВД  ab-nodot-noun ;
МГУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ММК  ab-nodot-noun ;
МООУН  ab-nodot-noun ;
МПВО  ab-nodot-noun ;
МУК  ab-nodot-noun ;
МФЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
МХАТ  ab-nodot-noun ;
МЧС ab-nodot-noun ;
НАТО  ab-nodot-noun ;
НКВД  ab-nodot-noun ;
НКО  ab-nodot-noun ;
НПФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
НПЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОАО  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОБСЕ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОВСЭРМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОКАТО  ab-nodot-noun ;
ООН ab-nodot-noun ;
ООО ab-nodot-noun ;
ОСБ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОТРК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ПОХ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ПСК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ПФР  ab-nodot-noun ;
РАН  ab-nodot-noun ;
РАФУЖ  ab-nodot-noun ;
РГПУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
РЖД  ab-nodot-noun ;
РИЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
РСФСР  ab-nodot-noun ;
РТР  ab-nodot-noun ;
РУФПС  ab-nodot-noun ;
РФ   ab-nodot-noun ;
СДЮШОР  ab-nodot-noun ;
СМИ  ab-nodot-noun ;
СНГ  ab-nodot-noun ;
СНИЛС  ab-nodot-noun ;
СОБР  ab-nodot-noun ;
СОШ  ab-nodot-noun ;
СПИД  ab-nodot-noun ;
СПК  ab-nodot-noun ;
СС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ССР  ab-nodot-noun ;
СУЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
США ab-nodot-noun ;
ТАСС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ТРК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ТРЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ТЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
УВД  ab-nodot-noun ;
УДАР  ab-nodot-noun ;
УЗИ  ab-nodot-noun ;
УМВД  ab-nodot-noun ;
УРО  ab-nodot-noun ;
УТТиСТ  ab-nodot-noun ;
УУР  ab-nodot-noun ;
УФК  ab-nodot-noun ;
УФМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
УФМС  ab-nodot-noun ;
УЭК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФАДН  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФАП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФАС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФАШ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФГОС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФОК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФСБ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ХМАО  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦЕ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦНК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦНС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ШОС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЭГ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЭКГ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮГУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮНЕСКО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮНИСЕФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON TRAB
досл ab-dot ;
А ab-dot-noun ;
Б ab-dot-noun ;
В ab-dot-noun ;
Г ab-dot-noun ;
Д ab-dot-noun ;
Е ab-dot-noun ;
Ж ab-dot-noun ;
З ab-dot-noun ;
И ab-dot-noun ;
Й ab-dot-noun ;
К ab-dot-noun ;
Л ab-dot-noun ;
М ab-dot-noun ;
Н ab-dot-noun ;
О ab-dot-noun ;
П ab-dot-noun ;
Р ab-dot-noun ;
С ab-dot-noun ;
Т ab-dot-noun ;
У ab-dot-noun ;
Ф ab-dot-noun ;
Х ab-dot-noun ;
Ц ab-dot-noun ;
Ч ab-dot-noun ;
Ш ab-dot-noun ;
Щ ab-dot-noun ;
Ъ ab-dot-noun ;
Ы ab-dot-noun ;
Ь ab-dot-noun ;
Э ab-dot-noun ;
Ю ab-dot-noun ;
Я ab-dot-noun ;
Ё ab-dot-noun ;
І ab-dot-noun ;
Ӧ ab-dot-noun ;
а ab-noun ;
б ab-noun ;
в ab-noun ;
г ab-noun ;
д ab-noun ;
е ab-noun ;
ж ab-noun ;
з ab-noun ;
и ab-noun ;
й ab-noun ;
к ab-noun ;
л ab-noun ;
м ab-noun ;
н ab-noun ;
о ab-noun ;
п ab-noun ;
р ab-noun ;
с ab-noun ;
т ab-noun ;
у ab-noun ;
ф ab-noun ;
х ab-noun ;
ц ab-noun ;
ч ab-noun ;
ш ab-noun ;
щ ab-noun ;
ъ ab-noun ;
ы ab-noun ;
ь ab-noun ;
э ab-noun ;
ю ab-noun ;
я ab-noun ;
ё ab-noun ;
і ab-noun ;
ӧ ab-noun ;
ЮГУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮНЕСКО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕГЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
ООН ab-nodot-noun ;
млн ab-nodot-noun ;
млрд ab-nodot-noun ;
ru ab-nodot-noun ;
